dict/fr-moderne.aff
FLAG long
SFX F. Y 72
SFX F. 0 0 . 10
SFX F. 0 s [eë] 11
SFX F. e 0 [éiï]e 12
SFX F. e s [éiï]e 13
SFX F. rice eur [dt]rice 12
SFX F. rice eurs [dt]rice 13
SFX F. de d de 12
SFX F. de ds de 13
SFX F. ffe f ffe 12
SFX F. ffe fs ffe 13
SFX F. ofe of ofe 12
SFX F. ofe ofs ofe 13
SFX F. anche anc anche 12
SFX F. anche ancs anche 13
SFX F. èche ec èche 12
SFX F. èche ecs èche 13
SFX F. aiche ais aiche 14
SFX F. aîche ais aîche 14
SFX F. khe kh khe 12
SFX F. khe khs khe 13
SFX F. he h [ut]he 12
SFX F. he hs [ut]he 13
SFX F. ke k ke 12
SFX F. ke ks ke 13
SFX F. le l [aiouû]le 12
SFX F. le ls [aiouû]le 13
SFX F. lle l [eiu]lle 12
SFX F. lle ls [eiu]lle 13
SFX F. ne n [aiou]ne 12
SFX F. ne ns [aiou]ne 13
SFX F. nne n [aeo]nne 12
SFX F. nne ns [aeo]nne 13
SFX F. igne in igne 12
SFX F. igne ins igne 13
SFX F. re r [aiuûy]re 12
SFX F. re rs [aiuûy]re 13
SFX F. ère er ère 12
SFX F. ère ers ère 13
SFX F. se s [^us]se 14
SFX F. esse e [^eo].esse 12
SFX F. esse es [^eo].esse 13
SFX F. eresse eur eresse 12
SFX F. eresse eurs eresse 13
SFX F. oresse eur oresse 12
SFX F. oresse eurs oresse 13
SFX F. sse s [^e]sse 14
SFX F. use us [^eo]use 14
SFX F. euse eur euse 12
SFX F. euse eurs euse 13
SFX F. te t [^èt]te 12
SFX F. te ts [^èt]te 13
SFX F. tte t tte 12
SFX F. tte ts tte 13
SFX F. ète et ète 12
SFX F. ète ets ète 13
SFX F. ue u [^gq]ue 12
SFX F. ue us [^gq]ue 13
SFX F. gue g gue 12
SFX F. gue gs gue 13
SFX F. cque c cque 12
SFX F. cque cs cque 13
SFX F. que c [^c]que 12
SFX F. que cs [^c]que 13
SFX F. ève ef ève 12
SFX F. ève efs ève 13
SFX F. ve f [iïu]ve 12
SFX F. ve fs [iïu]ve 13
SFX F. uë u uë 12
SFX F. uë us uë 13
SFX F. üe u üe 12
SFX F. üe us üe 13
SFX F. ze z ze 14

SFX W. N 8
SFX W. 0 0 . 10
SFX W. e es e 11
SFX W. ce x ce 14
SFX W. use ux [eo]use 14
SFX W. ausse aux ausse 14
SFX W. ousse oux ousse 14
SFX W. ale al ale 12
SFX W. ale aux ale 13

SFX S* Y 2
SFX S* 0 0/1 [^sxz]
SFX S* 0 s/2 [^sxz] 9

SFX X* Y 4
SFX X* 0 0/1 .
SFX X* 0 x/2 [aeoœ]u 9
SFX X* l ux/2 al 9
SFX X* il ux/2 ail 9

SFX A* Y 16
SFX A* an an/1 an
SFX A* an en/2 an 9
SFX A* f f/1 f
SFX A* f ves/2 f 9
SFX A* h h/1 h
SFX A* h hes/2 h 9
SFX A* s s/1 s
SFX A* s ses/2 s 9
SFX A* x h/1 x
SFX A* x hes/2 x 9
SFX A* y y/1 y
SFX A* y ies/2 y 9
SFX A* zz zz/1 zz
SFX A* zz zzes/2 zz 9
SFX A* z z/1 [^z]z
SFX A* z zzes/2 [^z]z 9

SFX I* Y 10
SFX I* a a/1 a
SFX I* a e/2 a 9
SFX I* e e/1 e
SFX I* e i/2 e 9
SFX I* o o/1 o
SFX I* o i/2 o 9
SFX I* um um/1 um
SFX I* um a/2 um 9
SFX I* us us/1 us
SFX I* us i/2 us 9

SFX F* Y 63
SFX F* 0 0/1 . 10
SFX F* 0 s/2 [eë] 11
SFX F* e 0/1 [éiï]e 12
SFX F* e s/2 [éiï]e 13
SFX F* rice eur/1 [dt]rice 12
SFX F* rice eurs/2 [dt]rice 13
SFX F* de d/1 de 12
SFX F* de ds/2 de 13
SFX F* ffe f/1 ffe 12
SFX F* ffe fs/2 ffe 13
SFX F* ofe of/1 ofe 12
SFX F* ofe ofs/2 ofe 13
SFX F* he h/1 [ut]he 12
SFX F* he hs/2 [ut]he 13
SFX F* èke ek/1 èke 12
SFX F* èke eks/2 èke 13
SFX F* le l/1 [aiouû]le 12
SFX F* le ls/2 [aiouû]le 13
SFX F* lle l/1 [eiu]lle 12
SFX F* lle ls/2 [eiu]lle 13
SFX F* ne n/1 [aiou]ne 12
SFX F* ne ns/2 [aiou]ne 13
SFX F* nne n/1 [aeo]nne 12
SFX F* nne ns/2 [aeo]nne 13
SFX F* gne n/1 igne 12
SFX F* gne ns/2 igne 13
SFX F* re r/1 [aiuûy]re 12
SFX F* re rs/2 [aiuûy]re 13
SFX F* ère er/1 ère 12
SFX F* ère ers/2 ère 13
SFX F* se s/1 [^us]se 14
SFX F* esse e/1 [^eo].esse 12
SFX F* esse es/2 [^eo].esse 13
SFX F* eresse eur/1 eresse 12
SFX F* eresse eurs/2 eresse 13
SFX F* oresse eur/1 oresse 12
SFX F* oresse eurs/2 oresse 13
SFX F* sse s/1 [^e]sse 14
SFX F* use us/1 [^eo]use 14
SFX F* euse eur/1 euse 12
SFX F* euse eurs/2 euse 13
SFX F* te t/1 [^èt]te 12
SFX F* te ts/2 [^èt]te 13
SFX F* tte t/1 tte 12
SFX F* tte ts/2 tte 13
SFX F* ète et/1 ète 12
SFX F* ète ets/2 ète 13
SFX F* ue u/1 [^gq]ue 12
SFX F* ue us/2 [^gq]ue 13
SFX F* gue g/1 gue 12
SFX F* gue gs/2 gue 13
SFX F* cque c/1 cque 12
SFX F* cque cs/2 cque 13
SFX F* que c/1 [^c]que 12
SFX F* que cs/2 [^c]que 13
SFX F* ève ef/1 ève 12
SFX F* ève efs/2 ève 13
SFX F* ve f/1 [iïu]ve 12
SFX F* ve fs/2 [iïu]ve 13
SFX F* uë u/1 uë 12
SFX F* uë us/2 uë 13
SFX F* üe u/1 üe 12
SFX F* üe us/2 üe 13

SFX W* Y 7
SFX W* 0 0/1 . 10
SFX W* e es/2 e 11
SFX W* ce x/1 ce 14
SFX W* use ux/1 [eo]use 14
SFX W* ousse oux/1 ousse 14
SFX W* ale al/1 ale 12
SFX W* ale aux/2 ale 13

PFX Um Y 29
PFX Um 0 0/3 .
PFX Um 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyœæ] 1
PFX Um 0 d'/3 [aàâeèéêiîoôuyœæ] 2
PFX Um 0 yotta/3 .
PFX Um 0 zetta/3 .
PFX Um 0 exa/3 .
PFX Um 0 l'exa . 1
PFX Um 0 d'exa/3 . 2
PFX Um 0 peta/3 .
PFX Um 0 téra/3 .
PFX Um 0 giga/3 .
PFX Um 0 méga/3 .
PFX Um 0 kilo/3 .
PFX Um 0 hecto/3 .
PFX Um 0 l'hecto . 1
PFX Um 0 d'hecto/3 . 2
PFX Um 0 déca/3 .
PFX Um 0 déci/3 .
PFX Um 0 centi/3 .
PFX Um 0 milli/3 .
PFX Um 0 micro/3 .
PFX Um 0 nano/3 .
PFX Um 0 pico/3 .
PFX Um 0 femto/3 .
PFX Um 0 atto/3 .
PFX Um 0 l'atto . 1
PFX Um 0 d'atto/3 . 2
PFX Um 0 zepto/3 .
PFX Um 0 yocto/3 .

PFX U. Y 20
PFX U. 0 Y .
PFX U. 0 Z .
PFX U. 0 E .
PFX U. 0 P .
PFX U. 0 T .
PFX U. 0 G .
PFX U. 0 M .
PFX U. 0 k .
PFX U. 0 h .
PFX U. 0 da .
PFX U. 0 d .
PFX U. 0 c .
PFX U. 0 m .
PFX U. 0 µ .
PFX U. 0 n .
PFX U. 0 p .
PFX U. 0 f .
PFX U. 0 a .
PFX U. 0 z .
PFX U. 0 y .

PFX n' Y 1
PFX n' 0 n' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 15

PFX q' Y 1
PFX q' 0 qu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 3

PFX d' Y 1
PFX d' 0 d' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 2

PFX j' Y 1
PFX j' 0 j' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 16

PFX c' Y 2
PFX c' 0 c' [eé] 17
PFX c' 0 ç' [a] 17

PFX l' Y 1
PFX l' 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 1

PFX m' Y 1
PFX m' 0 m' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 18

PFX t' Y 1
PFX t' 0 t' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 19

PFX s' Y 1
PFX s' 0 s' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 20

SFX zA Y 52
SFX zA voir voir/4 avoir 21
SFX zA voir yant/5 avoir 22
SFX zA avoir eu avoir 23
SFX zA avoir eus avoir 24
SFX zA avoir eue avoir 25
SFX zA avoir eues avoir 26
SFX zA voir i/6 avoir 27
SFX zA voir s/5 avoir 28
SFX zA voir 0/5 avoir 29
SFX zA voir vons/7 avoir 30
SFX zA voir vez/8 avoir 31
SFX zA avoir ont/5 avoir 32
SFX zA voir vais/9 avoir 33
SFX zA voir vais/5 avoir 34
SFX zA voir vait/10 avoir 35
SFX zA voir vions/7 avoir 36
SFX zA voir viez/8 avoir 37
SFX zA voir vaient/5 avoir 38
SFX zA avoir eus/9 avoir 39
SFX zA avoir eussé avoir 39
SFX zA avoir eus/5 avoir 40
SFX zA avoir eut/10 avoir 41
SFX zA avoir eûmes/7 avoir 42
SFX zA avoir eûtes/8 avoir 43
SFX zA avoir eurent/5 avoir 44
SFX zA voir urai/9 avoir 45
SFX zA voir uras/5 avoir 46
SFX zA voir ura/5 avoir 47
SFX zA voir urons/7 avoir 48
SFX zA voir urez/8 avoir 49
SFX zA voir uront/5 avoir 50
SFX zA voir urais/9 avoir 51
SFX zA voir urais/5 avoir 52
SFX zA voir urait/5 avoir 53
SFX zA voir urions/7 avoir 54
SFX zA voir uriez/8 avoir 55
SFX zA voir uraient/5 avoir 56
SFX zA voir ie/11 avoir 57
SFX zA voir ies/12 avoir 58
SFX zA voir it/12 avoir 59
SFX zA voir yons/13 avoir 60
SFX zA voir yez/14 avoir 61
SFX zA voir ient/12 avoir 62
SFX zA avoir eusse/9 avoir 63
SFX zA avoir eusses/5 avoir 64
SFX zA avoir eût/10 avoir 65
SFX zA avoir eussions/7 avoir 66
SFX zA avoir eussiez/8 avoir 67
SFX zA avoir eussent/5 avoir 68
SFX zA voir ie/15 avoir 69
SFX zA voir yons/15 avoir 70
SFX zA voir yez/15 avoir 71

SFX zE Y 49
SFX zE tre tre/16 être 21
SFX zE être étant/17 être 22
SFX zE être été être 72
SFX zE être suis être 27
SFX zE être es/5 être 28
SFX zE être est/18 être 29
SFX zE être sommes être 30
SFX zE tre tes/8 être 31
SFX zE être sont être 32
SFX zE être étais/9 être 33
SFX zE être étais/5 être 34
SFX zE être était/18 être 35
SFX zE être étions/7 être 36
SFX zE être étiez/8 être 37
SFX zE être étaient/18 être 38
SFX zE être fus être 39
SFX zE être fussé-je être 39
SFX zE être fus être 40
SFX zE être fut être 41
SFX zE être fûmes être 42
SFX zE être fûtes être 43
SFX zE être furent être 44
SFX zE être serai être 45
SFX zE être seras être 46
SFX zE être sera être 47
SFX zE être serons être 48
SFX zE être serez être 49
SFX zE être seront être 50
SFX zE être serais être 51
SFX zE être serais être 52
SFX zE être serait être 53
SFX zE être serions être 54
SFX zE être seriez être 55
SFX zE être seraient être 56
SFX zE être sois être 57
SFX zE être sois être 58
SFX zE être soit être 59
SFX zE être soyons être 60
SFX zE être soyez être 61
SFX zE être soient être 62
SFX zE être fusse être 63
SFX zE être fusses être 64
SFX zE être fût être 65
SFX zE être fussions être 66
SFX zE être fussiez être 67
SFX zE être fussent être 68
SFX zE être sois être 69
SFX zE être soyons être 70
SFX zE être soyez être 71

SFX a0 N 125
SFX a0 er er er 21
SFX a0 er ant [^cg]er 22
SFX a0 cer çant cer 22
SFX a0 ger geant ger 22
SFX a0 er e [^y]er 27
SFX a0 yer ye [^ou]yer 27
SFX a0 yer ie [aou]yer 27
SFX a0 er es [^y]er 28
SFX a0 yer yes [^ou]yer 28
SFX a0 yer ies [aou]yer 28
SFX a0 er e [^y]er 29
SFX a0 yer ye [^ou]yer 29
SFX a0 yer ie [aou]yer 29
SFX a0 er ons [^cg]er 30
SFX a0 cer çons cer 30
SFX a0 ger geons ger 30
SFX a0 er ez er 31
SFX a0 r nt [^y]er 32
SFX a0 yer yent [^ou]yer 32
SFX a0 yer ient [aou]yer 32
SFX a0 er ais [^cg]er 33
SFX a0 cer çais cer 33
SFX a0 ger geais ger 33
SFX a0 er ais [^cg]er 34
SFX a0 cer çais cer 34
SFX a0 ger geais ger 34
SFX a0 er ait [^cg]er 35
SFX a0 cer çait cer 35
SFX a0 ger geait ger 35
SFX a0 er ions er 36
SFX a0 er iez er 37
SFX a0 er aient [^cg]er 38
SFX a0 cer çaient cer 38
SFX a0 ger geaient ger 38
SFX a0 er ai [^cg]er 39
SFX a0 cer çai cer 39
SFX a0 ger geai ger 39
SFX a0 er as [^cg]er 40
SFX a0 cer ças cer 40
SFX a0 ger geas ger 40
SFX a0 er a [^cg]er 41
SFX a0 cer ça cer 41
SFX a0 ger gea ger 41
SFX a0 er âmes [^cg]er 42
SFX a0 cer çâmes cer 42
SFX a0 ger geâmes ger 42
SFX a0 er âtes [^cg]er 43
SFX a0 cer çâtes cer 43
SFX a0 ger geâtes ger 43
SFX a0 er èrent er 44
SFX a0 er erai [^y]er 45
SFX a0 yer yerai [^ou]yer 45
SFX a0 yer ierai [aou]yer 45
SFX a0 er eras [^y]er 46
SFX a0 yer yeras [^ou]yer 46
SFX a0 yer ieras [aou]yer 46
SFX a0 er era [^y]er 47
SFX a0 yer yera [^ou]yer 47
SFX a0 yer iera [aou]yer 47
SFX a0 er erons [^y]er 48
SFX a0 yer yerons [^ou]yer 48
SFX a0 yer ierons [aou]yer 48
SFX a0 er erez [^y]er 49
SFX a0 yer yerez [^ou]yer 49
SFX a0 yer ierez [aou]yer 49
SFX a0 er eront [^y]er 50
SFX a0 yer yeront [^ou]yer 50
SFX a0 yer ieront [aou]yer 50
SFX a0 er erais [^y]er 51
SFX a0 yer yerais [^ou]yer 51
SFX a0 yer ierais [aou]yer 51
SFX a0 er erais [^y]er 52
SFX a0 yer yerais [^ou]yer 52
SFX a0 yer ierais [aou]yer 52
SFX a0 er erait [^y]er 53
SFX a0 yer yerait [^ou]yer 53
SFX a0 yer ierait [aou]yer 53
SFX a0 er erions [^y]er 54
SFX a0 yer yerions [^ou]yer 54
SFX a0 yer ierions [aou]yer 54
SFX a0 er eriez [^y]er 55
SFX a0 yer yeriez [^ou]yer 55
SFX a0 yer ieriez [aou]yer 55
SFX a0 er eraient [^y]er 56
SFX a0 yer yeraient [^ou]yer 56
SFX a0 yer ieraient [aou]yer 56
SFX a0 er e [^y]er 57
SFX a0 yer ye [^ou]yer 57
SFX a0 yer ie [aou]yer 57
SFX a0 er es [^y]er 58
SFX a0 yer yes [^ou]yer 58
SFX a0 yer ies [aou]yer 58
SFX a0 er e [^y]er 59
SFX a0 yer ye [^ou]yer 59
SFX a0 yer ie [aou]yer 59
SFX a0 er ions er 60
SFX a0 er iez er 61
SFX a0 er ent [^y]er 62
SFX a0 yer yent [^ou]yer 62
SFX a0 yer ient [aou]yer 62
SFX a0 er asse [^cg]er 63
SFX a0 cer çasse cer 63
SFX a0 ger geasse ger 63
SFX a0 er asses [^cg]er 64
SFX a0 cer çasses cer 64
SFX a0 ger geasses ger 64
SFX a0 er ât [^cg]er 65
SFX a0 cer çât cer 65
SFX a0 ger geât ger 65
SFX a0 er assions [^cg]er 66
SFX a0 cer çassions cer 66
SFX a0 ger geassions ger 66
SFX a0 er assiez [^cg]er 67
SFX a0 cer çassiez cer 67
SFX a0 ger geassiez ger 67
SFX a0 er assent [^cg]er 68
SFX a0 cer çassent cer 68
SFX a0 ger geassent ger 68
SFX a0 er e [^y]er 69
SFX a0 yer ye [^ou]yer 69
SFX a0 yer ie [aou]yer 69
SFX a0 er ons [^cg]er 70
SFX a0 cer çons cer 70
SFX a0 ger geons ger 70
SFX a0 er ez er 71
